Utah statutes.
57-14-202.   Use of private land without charge -- Effect.

Except as provided in Subsection 57-14-204(1), an owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge, or for a nominal fee of no more than $1 per year, any person to use the owner's land for any recreational purpose, or an owner of a public access area open to public recreational access under Title 73, Chapter 29, Public Waters Access Act, does not:

(1)  make any representation or extend any assurance that the land is safe for any purpose;

(2)  confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

(3)  assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to persons or property caused by an act or omission of the person or any other person who enters upon the land; or

(4)  owe any duty to curtail the owner's use of the land during its use for recreational purposes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

